Massachusetts, session 194th, H1550.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16 of said chapter 121B, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
“Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary in this chapter or in any other general or
special law relative to the tax status of real property, buildings or other structures owned by a
housing authority, a controlled affiliate, or another private entity, including without limitation a
for-profit or charitable corporation, general or limited partnership, or limited liability company,
that contain or will contain replacement units as defined in section 1, shall be exempt from
taxation, betterments and special assessments to the extent such buildings or structures are
restricted for use as replacement units, including associated common areas and associated land.
If replacement units and associated common areas constitute only a portion of such resulting
buildings or structures, the exemption shall be prorated based on the ratio which the square
footage of replacement units bears to the square footage of all other residential or commercial
units within the buildings or structures. The housing authority, controlled affiliate or other
of 2

private entity shall pay (a) with respect to the exempt portion of the buildings or structures and
land, a payment in lieu of taxes consistent with the valuation or other formula generally
applicable under this section to the housing authority’s real estate in the city or town in which
such real estate is located, or as otherwise previously agreed upon between the city or town and
the housing authority as the method for computing the payments to be made in lieu of taxes, and
using the ratio described above; and (b) with respect to the non-exempt portion of the buildings
or structures and land, real estate taxes in accordance with chapter 59 of the General Laws based
on the fair cash value of the non-exempt portion of the buildings or structures and non-exempt
portion of the land using the ratio described above.”.
of 2